Louisiana, session 2026, HB33.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2178.1(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2178.1. Back-Deferred Retirement Option Plan
* * *
B.(1) At the time of retirement, the member shall select a Back-DROP
period to be specified in whole months. The Back-DROP period shall be the most
recent calendar period corresponding to the member's accrued creditable service.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection, the Back-DROP period
shall not exceed the lesser of thirty-six months or the number of months of creditable
service accrued after the member first became eligible for regular retirement.
(3) However, members who have A member who has at least thirty or more
years of service but less than thirty-five years of service may select a Back-DROP
period not to exceed the lesser of forty-eight months or the number of months of
creditable service accrued after the member first became eligible for regular
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 33 ENROLLED
retirement. The Back-DROP period shall be the most recent calendar period
corresponding to the member's accrued creditable service.
(4) A member who has thirty-five or more years of service may select a
Back-DROP period not to exceed the lesser of sixty months or the number of months
of creditable service accrued after the member first became eligible for regular
retirement.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.